tests/пальто.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах пальто":
    пальто<n><nom> :  пальто 
    пальто<n><gen> :  пальтон 
    пальто<n><dat> :  пальтона 
    пальто<n><loc> :  пальтора 
    пальто<n><abl> :  пальторан 
    пальто<n><ins> :  пальтопа 
    пальто<n><abe> :  пальтосӑр 
    пальто<n><ben> :  пальтошӑн
    пальто<n><px1sg><nom> :  пальтом 
    пальто<n><px1sg><gen> :  пальтомӑн 
    пальто<n><px1sg><dat> :  пальтома 
    пальто<n><px1sg><loc> :  пальтомра 
    пальто<n><px1sg><abl> :  пальтомран 
    пальто<n><px1sg><ins> :  пальтомпа 
    пальто<n><px1sg><abe> :  пальтомсӑр 
    пальто<n><px1sg><ben> :  пальтомшӑн
    пальто<n><px2sg><nom> :  пальту 
    пальто<n><px2sg><gen> :  пальтун 
    пальто<n><px2sg><dat> :  пальтуна 
    пальто<n><px2sg><loc> :  пальтунта 
    пальто<n><px2sg><abl> :  пальтунтан 
    пальто<n><px2sg><ins> :  пальтупа 
    пальто<n><px2sg><abe> :  пальтусӑр 
    пальто<n><px2sg><ben> :  пальтушӑн
    пальто<n><px3sp><nom> :  пальти 
    пальто<n><px3sp><gen> :  пальтин 
    пальто<n><px3sp><dat> :  пальтине 
    пальто<n><px3sp><loc> :  пальтинче 
    пальто<n><px3sp><abl> :  пальтинчен 
    пальто<n><px3sp><ins> :  пальтипе 
    пальто<n><px3sp><abe> :  пальтисӗр 
    пальто<n><px3sp><ben> :  пальтишӗн
    пальто<n><px1pl><nom> :  пальтомӑр 
    пальто<n><px1pl><gen> :  пальтомӑрӑн 
    пальто<n><px1pl><dat> :  пальтомӑра 
    пальто<n><px1pl><loc> :  пальтомӑрта 
    пальто<n><px1pl><abl> :  пальтомӑртан 
    пальто<n><px1pl><ins> :  пальтомӑрпа 
    пальто<n><px1pl><abe> :  пальтомӑрсӑр 
    пальто<n><px1pl><ben> :  пальтомӑршӑн
    пальто<n><px2pl><nom> :  пальтӑр 
    пальто<n><px2pl><gen> :  пальтӑрӑн 
    пальто<n><px2pl><dat> :  пальтӑра 
    пальто<n><px2pl><loc> :  пальтӑрта 
    пальто<n><px2pl><abl> :  пальтӑртан 
    пальто<n><px2pl><ins> :  пальтӑрпа 
    пальто<n><px2pl><abe> :  пальтӑрсӑр 
    пальто<n><px2pl><ben> :  пальтӑршӑн
    пальто<n><pl><nom> :  пальтосем 
    пальто<n><pl><gen> :  пальтосен 
    пальто<n><pl><dat> :  пальтосене 
    пальто<n><pl><loc> :  пальтосенче 
    пальто<n><pl><abl> :  пальтосенчен 
    пальто<n><pl><ins> :  пальтосемпе 
    пальто<n><pl><abe> :  пальтосемсӗр 
    пальто<n><pl><ben> :  пальтосемшӗн
    пальто<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  пальтомсем 
    пальто<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  пальтомсен 
    пальто<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  пальтомсене 
    пальто<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  пальтомсенче 
    пальто<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  пальтомсенчен 
    пальто<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  пальтомсемпе 
    пальто<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  пальтомсемсӗр 
    пальто<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  пальтомсемшӗн
    пальто<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  пальтусем 
    пальто<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  пальтусен 
    пальто<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  пальтусене 
    пальто<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  пальтусенче 
    пальто<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  пальтусенчен 
    пальто<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  пальтусемпе 
    пальто<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  пальтусемсӗр 
    пальто<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  пальтусемшӗн
    пальто<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  пальтисем 
    пальто<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  пальтисен 
    пальто<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  пальтисене 
    пальто<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  пальтисенче 
    пальто<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  пальтисенчен 
    пальто<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  пальтисемпе 
    пальто<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  пальтисемсӗр 
    пальто<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  пальтисемшӗн
    пальто<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  пальтомӑрсем 
    пальто<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  пальтомӑрсен 
    пальто<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  пальтомӑрсене 
    пальто<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  пальтомӑрсенче 
    пальто<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  пальтомӑрсенчен 
    пальто<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  пальтомӑрсемпе 
    пальто<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  пальтомӑрсемсӗр 
    пальто<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  пальтомӑрсемшӗн
    пальто<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  пальтӑрсем 
    пальто<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  пальтӑрсен 
    пальто<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  пальтӑрсене 
    пальто<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  пальтӑрсенче 
    пальто<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  пальтӑрсенчен 
    пальто<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  пальтӑрсемпе 
    пальто<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  пальтӑрсемсӗр 
    пальто<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  пальтӑрсемшӗн
